Hawaii, session 2026, GM1248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that fluctuating federal
policies continue to cause widespread challenges across the
country, including reduced funding for federal and state
programs that provide essential community services. To address
these often sudden changes, the executive branch must have the
ability to adapt to fluctuating revenue projections by shifting
available moneys.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to allow the moneys
in certain special or revolving funds to be used for
administrative and operating costs of the related programs.
SECTION 2. Section 163D-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The corporation shall hold the fund in an account or
accounts separate from other funds. The corporation shall
[invest ond reinvest] use the fund [and--the income thereof] to:
(1) Purchase qualified securities issued by enterprises
for the purpose of raising seed capital; provided that
SB2598 CDl LRB 26-1369.docx
iiiiiiiiHininiiiiKiiH

Page 2 S.B. NO 2598
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
the investment shall comply with the requirements of
this chapter;
(2) Acquire interests or rights in land having value to
the State for agricultural production, agricultural
infrastructure, irrigation, watershed protection
related to agricultural viability, or other purpose
consistent with this chapter. The interests or rights
in land acquired may include the fee title, the
establishment of a permanent conservation easement
under chapter 198, an agricultural easement, or other
easement or interest in the land. The acquisition
shall constitute a public purpose for which public
funds may be expended or advanced;
(3) Pay costs related to the operation, maintenance, and
management of lands acquired under paragraph (2) that
are necessary to protect, maintain, or restore
resources that are at risk on those lands, or that
provide for greater public access and enjoyment of the
lands; provided that the payment of costs from the
fund related to the operation, maintenance, and
management of lands acquired under paragraph (2) shall
SB2598 CDl LRB 26-1369.docx
inillllllBlliMHilllllll

Page 3
S.B. NO.
-1
not exceed five per cent of the fund's annual fund
revenues for the previous year;
(4) Pay debt service on state financial instruments
relating to the acquisition of land under paragraph

[-(-3-)-] (5) Make grants, loans, and provide other monetary
forms of assistance necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter; and
[4-3}-] (6) Purchase securities as may be lawful investments
for fiduciaries in the State.
All appropriations, grants, contractual reimbursements, and
other funds not designated for this purpose may be used to pay
for the proper general expenses and to carry out the purposes of
the corporation [-;-] , including for personnel and other operating
costs.
Any net proceeds or revenue from the operation, management,
sale, lease, or other disposition of land or the improvements on
the land acquired or constructed by the board under this chapter
shall be deposited into or credited to the fund."
SECTION 3. Section 206E-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
SB2598 CDl LRB 26-1369.docx
■■nnMiiniiiMHiii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
"§206E-16 Hawaii conununity development special fund.
There is created the Hawaii community development special fund
into which all receipts and revenues of the authority shall be
deposited. Proceeds from the fund shall be used for the
purposes of this chapter[t], including the costs of its
administration."
SECTION 4. Section 206M-62, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-[•] §206M-62 [^] Strategic development programs revolving
fund. (a) There is established the strategic development
programs revolving fund. The following moneys shall be
deposited into the strategic development programs revolving fund
and shall not be considered part of the general fund: all
moneys appropriated by the legislature, received as repayments
of loans, earned on investments, received pursuant to a venture
agreement, received as royalties, received as premiums or fees
charged by the development corporation, or otherwise received by
the development corporation.
(b') Moneys in the strategic development programs revolving
fund shall be used for the following purposes:
SB2598 CDl LRB 26-1369.docx 4
illllRIIIIIIHIIIIIIMHH

Page 5
S.B. NO.
(1) To administer and fund the cost of operations of
strategic development programs under part V of
chapter 206M; and
(2) For any other purpose deemed necessary to carry out
the purposes of part V of chapter 206M."
SECTION 5. Section 302A-1706, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows;
"(c) The school facilities special fund shall be
administered by the authority and used to fund any school
development, planning, or construction project, including
prekindergarten facilities, within the jurisdiction of the
authority[—], including the cost of operations."
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
SB2598 CDl LRB 26-1369.docx
■igiHiiiNnnHffliiiii

S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No.2598, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
136-26

SB No. 2598, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives